Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1980.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1740.3 of Title 21, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. For the purposes of this section:
1. “Cardholder” means any person to whom a physical or virtual
gift card or gift certificate is issued through a purchase or who
receives a gift card or gift certificate from another;
2. “Gift card” means card, code, or device that is issued to a
consumer on a prepaid basis primarily for personal, family, or
household purposes in a specified amount, regardless of whether that
amount may be increased or reloaded in exchange for payment and that
is redeemable upon presentation at a merchant or multiple merchants.
It includes closed-loop gift cards that are redeemable at a single
merchant or group of affiliated merchants and open-loop gift cards

that are redeemable at multiple unaffiliated merchants for goods or
services within the payment card network;
3. “Gift certificate” means a written promise that is issued in
a specified amount, indicated on its face, and cannot be increased
in value, is usable to purchase goods or services only at a single
merchant or multiple merchants, and is purchased by a consumer on a
prepaid basis in exchange for payment;
4. “Issuer” means a person or entity, or agent thereof, who
issues gift cards or gift certificates to consumers;
5. “Redemption information” means information unique to each
gift card or gift certificate; and
6. “Value” means the greatest amount of economic loss the owner
of the property might reasonably suffer.
B. 1. Any person who knowingly and willfully acquires or
retains possession of a gift card, gift certificate, or redemption
information without the consent of the cardholder or issuer shall,
upon conviction, be guilty of larceny punishable pursuant to Section
1702 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
2. Any person who knowingly and willfully alters or tampers
with a gift card, gift certificate, or the packaging of such items
shall, upon conviction, be guilty of forgery in the third degree
punishable pursuant to paragraph 3 of Section 1621 of Title 21 of
the Oklahoma Statutes.
3. Any person who knowingly and willfully devises a scheme to
obtain the redemption information to a gift card or gift certificate
from a cardholder or issuer by means of false or fraudulent
pretenses, representations, or promises shall, upon conviction, be
guilty of fraud punishable pursuant to Section 1541.1 of Title 21 of
the Oklahoma Statutes.
4. Any person who knowingly and willfully uses, for the purpose
of obtaining money, goods, services, or anything else of value, a
gift card or gift card redemption information that has been obtained
in violation of paragraph 1 or 2 of this subsection shall, upon
conviction, be guilty of larceny punishable pursuant to Section 1702
ENR. S. B. NO. 1980 Page 2

of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes. If the value of all money,
goods, services, and other things of value obtained in violation of
this paragraph exceeds Nine Hundred Fifty Dollars ($950.00) in any
consecutive six-month period, the person shall, upon conviction, be
guilty of grand larceny punishable pursuant to Section 1705 of Title
21 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1980 Page 3

Passed the Senate the 5th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 28th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1980 Page 4